Washington statutes.
RCW 19.370.030

List of members and affiliates—List of works licensed—Availability.

A performing rights society must make available electronically to business proprietors the most current available list of members and affiliates represented by the performing rights society and the most current available list of the performed works that the performing rights society licenses.

[ 2016 c 38 s 3.]